Nebraska, session 109, LB99.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB99 LB99
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 83-170, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-170 As used in the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Board of Parole;
(2) Committed offender means any person who, under any provision of
law, is sentenced or committed to a facility operated by the department
or is sentenced or committed to the department other than a person
adjudged to be as described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of
section 43-247 by a juvenile court;
(3) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(5) Director of Supervision and Services means the Director of
Supervision and Services appointed pursuant to section 83-1,101;
(6) Facility means any prison, reformatory, training school,
reception center, community guidance center, group home, or other
institution operated by the department;
(7) Good time means any reduction of sentence granted pursuant to
sections 83-1,107 and 83-1,108;
(8) Maximum term means the maximum sentence provided by law or the
maximum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is shorter;
(9) Minimum term means the minimum sentence provided by law or the
minimum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is longer;
(10) Pardon authority means the power to remit fines and forfeitures
and to grant respites, reprieves, pardons, or commutations;
(11) Parole term means the time from release on parole to the
completion of the maximum term, reduced by good time;
(12) Person committed to the department means any person sentenced
or committed to a facility within the department; and
(13) Restrictive housing means conditions of confinement that
provide limited contact with other offenders, strictly controlled
-2-

LB99 LB99
2025 2025
movement while out of cell, and out-of-cell time of less than ten hours
per day. twenty-four hours per week; and
(14) Solitary confinement means the status of confinement of an
inmate in an individual cell having solid, soundproof doors and which
deprives the inmate of all visual and auditory contact with other
persons.
Sec. 2. Section 83-173.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-173.03 (1) No inmate shall be held in restrictive housing unless
done in the least restrictive manner consistent with maintaining order in
the facility and pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the department pursuant to the Administrative Procedure
Act.
(2)(a) No inmate shall be held in restrictive housing for more than
fifteen consecutive days.
(b) No more than one inmate shall be placed in restrictive housing
in a cell designed for one individual, unless all such inmates
voluntarily agree to such placement in writing.
(3) (2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act establishing
levels of restrictive housing as may be necessary to administer the
correctional system. Rules and regulations shall establish behavior,
conditions, and mental health status under which an inmate may be placed
in each confinement level as well as procedures for making such
determinations. Rules and regulations shall also provide for
individualized transition plans, developed with the active participation
of the committed offender, for each confinement level back to the general
population or to society.
(4) No (3) On and after March 1, 2020, no inmate who is a member of
a vulnerable population shall be placed in restrictive housing. In line
with the least restrictive framework, an inmate who is a member of a
-3-

LB99 LB99
2025 2025
vulnerable population may be assigned to immediate segregation to protect
himself or herself, staff, other inmates, or inmates who are members of
vulnerable populations pending classification. The department shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act regarding restrictive housing to address risks for inmates
who are members of vulnerable populations. Nothing in this subsection
prohibits the department from developing secure mental health housing to
serve the needs of inmates with serious mental illnesses as defined in
section 44-792, developmental disabilities as defined in section 71-1107,
or traumatic brain injuries as defined in section 79-1118.01 in such a
way that provides for meaningful access to social interaction, exercise,
environmental stimulation, and therapeutic programming.
(5) (4) For purposes of this section: ,
(a) Developmental disability has the same meaning as in section
71-1107;
(b) Member member of a vulnerable population means an inmate who is
eighteen years of age or younger, pregnant, or diagnosed with a serious
mental illness as defined in section 44-792, a developmental disability
as defined in section 71-1107, or a traumatic brain injury;
(c) Serious mental illness means any mental health condition that
medical science affirms is caused by a biological disorder of the brain
and that substantially limits the life activities of the person with the
condition. A person shall still be considered to have a serious mental
illness notwithstanding the fact that, at a particular time, the mental
health condition does not, as a result of treatment or medication,
substantially limit such person's life activities. Serious mental illness
includes, but is not limited to: (i) Schizophrenia, (ii) schizoaffective
disorder, (iii) delusional disorder, (iv) bipolar affective disorder, (v)
major depression, and (vi) obsessive compulsive disorder; and
(d) Traumatic brain injury has the same meaning as defined in
section 79-1118.01.
-4-

LB99 LB99
2025 2025
Sec. 3. Section 83-4,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-4,114 (1) There shall be no corporal punishment or disciplinary
restrictions on diet.
(2) Disciplinary restrictions on clothing, bedding, mail,
visitations, use of toilets, washbowls, or scheduled showers shall be
imposed only for abuse of such privilege or facility and only as
authorized by written directives, guidance documents, and operational
manuals.
(3)(a) (3) No person shall be placed in solitary confinement.
(b) Solitary confinement means confinement of an inmate for at least
twenty-two hours per day in an individual cell if:
(i) The cell deprives the inmate of all visual and auditory contact
with other persons;
(ii) The cell has reduced or no natural light;
(iii) The confinement involves a restriction or deprivation of
reading material, television, radios, or other property;
(iv) The confinement includes significant restrictions on
visitation; or
(v) The confinement restricts the inmate's ability to participate in
group activities, including eating with others.
(4) The director shall issue an annual report on or before September
15 to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature. The report to the
Clerk of the Legislature shall be issued electronically. For all inmates
who were held in restrictive housing during the prior year, the report
shall contain the race, gender, age, and length of time each inmate has
continuously been held in restrictive housing. The report shall also
contain:
(a) The number of inmates held in restrictive housing;
(b) The reason or reasons each inmate was held in restrictive
housing;
-5-

LB99 LB99
2025 2025
(c) The number of inmates held in restrictive housing who have been
diagnosed with a mental illness or behavioral disorder and the type of
mental illness or behavioral disorder by inmate;
(d) The number of inmates who were released from restrictive housing
directly to parole or into the general public and the reason for such
release;
(e) The number of inmates who were placed in restrictive housing for
his or her own safety and the underlying circumstances for each
placement;
(f) To the extent reasonably ascertainable, comparable statistics
for the nation and each of the states that border Nebraska pertaining to
subdivisions (4)(a) through (e) of this section;
(g) The mean and median length of time for all inmates held in
restrictive housing; and
(h) A description of all inmate housing areas that hold inmates in a
setting that is neither general population nor restrictive housing,
including the purpose of each setting, data on how many inmates were held
in such settings, the average length of stay in such settings,
information on programs provided in each setting, data on program
completions in each setting, staffing levels and types of staff in each
setting, and any other information or data relevant to the operation of
such settings. For the purposes of this subdivision, general population
means an inmate housing area that allows out-of-cell movement without the
use of restraints, a minimum of ten six hours per day of out-of-cell
time, regular access to programming areas outside the living unit, and
access to services available to the broader population.
Sec. 4. Original sections 83-170, 83-173.03, and 83-4,114, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-